Washington statutes.
RCW 18.79.300

Department—Rules for administration.

The department, subject to chapter 34.05 RCW, the Washington Administrative Procedure Act, may adopt such reasonable rules as may be necessary to carry out the duties imposed upon it in the administration of this chapter.

[ 1994 sp.s. c 9 s 430.]